Washington statutes.
RCW 36.23.067

Reproduced court records have same force and effect as original.

Any print, whether enlarged or not, from any photographic film, including any photographic plate, microphotographic film, or photostatic negative or similar reproduction, or from any electronic record, of any original record, document, instrument, book, paper, deposition, or transcript which has been processed in accordance with the provisions of RCW 36.23.065, and has been certified by the county clerk under his or her official seal as a true copy, may be used in all instances, including introduction in evidence in any judicial or administrative proceeding, that the original record, document, instrument, book, paper, deposition, or transcript might have been used, and shall have the full force and effect of the original for all purposes.

[ 1998 c 226 s 2; 1963 c 4 s 36.23.067. Prior: 1957 c 201 s 2.]